ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/da_DK/hyph_da_DK.dic
ka1to
ka1tø
1kag
2k1agt
1kas
ka1sa
ka1str
ka1sk
kas1p
1kao
1kam2p.
1kam3pe
1kap
ka1v
1kaj
k1b
ke1e2
ke1da
ke1dr
ke1lag
ke1le
ke1lo
k2e1lu
k2e1ra
ke1rå
k1er1r
ke2r3i2nd
ke1ri
ke1ro
ke1ta
ke1ti
ke1i
k2e1sl2
ke1st
ke2skar
ke1sk
ke1sp
ke1v
ke1u
k1d
2k1le
k2læ
1klu
kå1re
kn2
2k1ne
k2nip
k1ni
k2niv
1k2næ
1krav
k1r2e.
k1ren
k1re2r.
k1rin
kri1sti2
1krim
1kræf
k1ta
kt1ar
k1te
kte1o1
k1tr
k2t1ra
k1ti
k2t1in
kt1st
k2ts
kt1sk
k1to
kt1h
kt1c
k1tø
k1tu
k2t1ud
k1tj
ki1e
ki2n1s
1kir
ki1st
kik1
k1g
k1sa
k2sar
ks1l2
ks2la
k1slu
ks1n
ks1tal
ks1tam
ks1tr
ks1ti
k1sor
k1sot
ks1og
ks1ha
ks1hy
ks1ka
k1sk2r
k2s1kor
ks1c
ks1p
k1s2pi
ks1v
k1svag
k1su
1k2oa
kob1l
k2ob
ko2n1s
ko1ra
ko1re
kore3n
k1ord1n
ko1ri
ko1sa
ko1st1r
1kom
ko2kr
k2ok
kop1em
ko1p1l
k1opta
kop1t
k1oph
k1of1r
ko1ven
ko1ve2m
ko1vu
k1ou
1kyst
ky1k
k1h
k1m
k1k
k1c
k1p
k1f
k1fe1
kfor1
1kæd
kæld1r
1kær1l2
kæt1
k1æ2s
1kæmp
1køb
kø1e
kød1s
1køk
kø1je
kud2sl2
ku1la
kuld1r
1kult
ku1læ
ku1lø
ku1na
1ku2ns
ku1ra
ku1re
ku1ri
1kurs
ku1te
ku1st
ku1mu
1ku1v
2c.
c1a2r1b
ca1ro
ca1t
ca1ta1
ca1sp
1ce1b
1ced
1cel
ce1le
ce1lo
c2e1no
1ce1ri
ce1ti
ce2sk
2cem
ce1mø
1cek
ce2ce
ce1c
2cej
cle2
cre2
c1t
1ci
ci2e
ci3e2r.
ci1tr
ci2ø
c1g
co1re
co1ri
1cos
1co2m
1cy
c2h
2ch.
1che
2c2ht
1cho
2ch1c
ch1v
c1hu1
2ck
ck1en
ck1ers
ck1l
ck1st
c1c
cce2s1
c1p
cæ1
2cu
cua1
2p.
pa1la
pa1ro
1pat
pa1st
1pak
1pap
pa1v
p1b
pe1a
pe1d2
pe1la
peli2n
pe1li
pel1v
pens1l2
pe2ns
1pe2r.
p2e1ra
pe1ru
pe1ta
pe1ti
pe1i
1pes
pe1sp
pe1v
2pej
p1d
pda3ge
p1dag
p1len
p1lø
på1
1pål
p1n
p2ra
1prak
p1rå
1pris
p2ro
1pr2o1b
1prod
1proc
1pro1j
p2ræ
2pru
p1t
pta1b2
p2t1s
p2t1h
ptø1
1pia
pi1e2r.
pi1lu
pi2ru
1pig
p1g
p1sa
p1sn
p1st
p1so
p1sc
p1sv
p1su
1po1li
po1ly
po2n1s
po1ra
2po1re
pore3n
po1ri
po1rø
1p2oi
poo2
1pom
p1of
2pov
p1ha
1pher
1phr
p1ho
p1hæ
p2hus
p1hu
p1m
p1me1
p1k
p1c
p1p
p1f
pæl2
p1æg
p1æ2s
p1v
1pud
1pul
1punk
1put
pu1ta
pu1te
1pum
2f.
1fa
fa1b
fan2sk
fa2ns
fag2r
fag1s2p
fa2gs
fa1sa
fa1ku
2f1b
f1be1
1fe
fe1e2
fe1le
fe1lo
f2e1ra
fer2sl2
fe1tis
fe1i
fe2må
fe1je
2f1d
f1lig
f2lyt
få1
fran2c3e
fran1c
fra1s
fra1f
2frej
fro2s
frø1s
fru1s
2ft
f1ta
ft1an
ft1ar
f1te
ft1rø
ft1ru
f1ti
f3til
f2t1in
ft1ic
ft1st
f2ts
ft2s1in
ft1si
ft1sv
ft1h
ft1v
ft1u
1fi
fi1as
fi1er
fing1r
fi2ng
fi1st
fi2ki
fik1o
fi1c
f1g2
2f1s2
fsto2
f2s3h
fo3ni1e
fo1ni
fo2n2o
for1a
for1e2n
for1d
for1tv
for3so
foru2
fo1st
3f2ok
1fy
f1h
2f1m
2f1k
f1p
f1f
1fæ
færd2
fær1ø
fæ1tr
f1øk
fø1j
2f1v
1fu
f1ud
ful2l
fu1re
fug4le2n.
fug1le
1fj
fju1
æ1ar
æb1ler
æb1let
æ1e
æ1da
æde2st
æ1de
æd1r
æ1do
æ1le
ælles1
æl1l
3ællinger
ælli2ng
ællin1ge
æl1vi
ænd1st
æ2nd
æn1gu
æ2ng
æ1no
ær1a
æ1re
ære2g
ære2j
ær2ti
æ1ri
æ2r1i2ns
ærg1r
ær1o
ærk1v
ær2p2e.
ær1p
ær1ø1e
æ1te
æ1ti
æt1h
æ1i
æg1l
æg2tr
æ2gs1
æg1u
æ1sa
æs1l2
æ2s3nin4
æs1ni
æsning3er
æsni2ng
æsnin1ge
æ1sta
æ1str
æ1sty
æ1so
æs1h
æs1kar
æs2ko
æs1p
æ1o1
æ1h
æm1s
æ1mø
æk1ak
æ1ke
æk1n2
æk1r
æk1i
æk1s1l2
æks2t1r
æk1s1p
æ1ko
æk2v
æ1c
æ1pa
æp1h
æ1ve
æve1a
æv2ns1
æ2vn
æv1r
æ1vi
æ1u2
æus1
øbe2m
ø1be
øb1l
øb1sl2
ø2bs
øb1sta
ø1bo
ø1el
ø1en
ø1et
ød1r
øds1ka
øds1k2r
ød2su
ø2dæ
ø1le
ø3led
ø1li
øl2sa
ø2l1s
øl1va
øn1a
ønd1r
ø2nd
øn1st
ø2ns
øn1sk2r
øns1p
øn1u
ør1a2
ø1re
ø2r3end.
øre2nd
ør1d
ø1ri
ør1gr
ør1s1ma
ør1sk
ør2sv
ør1o
ø1ru
ø1te
øt1r
ø1i1
øge1na2
ø1ge
øg1s1l2
ø2gs
ø1gu
ø1sa
øs1la
øsl2
øst1a
ø1sp
ø1o2
øm1af
ø1ma
øm1s
ø1ke
ø1kr
1øko
ø1kor
ø1c
ø1p
øf1l
ø1fo
øve1st
ø1ves
øv1r
ø2v1s
ø1væ
ø1u
øj1a
ø1jel
øj1la
øj1r
øj1sl2
ø2js
øj1sk
øj1s1v
2v.
va1li1
val2gå
v2alg
va1lu
van4dret
van1dr
va2nd
vand3re2t.
vars1l2
1vat
va2ta
va2te
va2t1s
va1ku
1vac
v1af
2v1b
1v2e.
ve1ar
1vee2
ved1an
ve2d1ak
ve2den
ve1de
ved1å
ve2d1ø2
ve1la
ve1len
ve2l1s2
vel3s1m
velo2
vel1ov
vel1v
1ve1ne
2vener
ve2ni
v2e2n1o
1venu
ver1al
v2era
ve1ran
ver1il
ve1ri
ver1g
ve1ti
ve1i
1ves
ve2steg
ve1ste
ve1str
ve2sy
1vek
ve1pi
1vev
ve1je
v1d
v1la
v3le
v1li
v1ly
v1læ
v1lø
v1lu
vå2d
v1år
2vn
vn1al
v1nø
v1rå
v1ta
v1te2
vter1
v1tr
v1ti
v1tæ
v1tu
vi1a
vi1e1d
vi1el
vi3er
vi1es
vi2l2s
vi3nø
vi1ra
vi3o
2viv
v1g
2vs
vs1ar
vs1ak
v2s1af
vs1ej
v1se
vs1l2
vs1nø
v1s1ta
vs1tru
v3si
vs1in
vs1or
v1sy
vs1h
v1ska
v2s1kl
vs1k2r
vs1ky
v2s1kv
vs1ku
vs1cy2
v3spa
vs1po
vs1v
v3sj
vod1
vo1re2n
vo1ret
vo1res
vo1s
v1om
v1op
2vov
1vy
v1h
2v1m
v1me1
v1k
v1c
v1p
vpris3t
v1pris
v1f
væn1
v1øe
v1øl
1vør
v1v
v1ud
v1j
u1al
ual1u
u1ar
u1at
ub1le
ublik2
u2b1s
ub1j
u1ed
u1el
ue2n
u1er
u1et
u1e2s.
u2e1sl2
ue1st
ue1so
u1es1f
ue1m
ue1u
ud1ar
2uder
u1de
ude1s
ud1r
ud1in
u1di
ud1sl2
ud1så
ud1sn
ud1st
ud3str
ud1sy
ud1sk
ud1sp
uds1v
ud1or
ud1ov
ud1ø2v
u1le
ul1eu
uld3e2nd
ul1de
ul2dra
ul1tr
u1li
u2l1il
ul2sl2
u2l1s
ul3sp
u2l1op
1uly
ul1m
ul1vo
u1lu
un2d1ej
u2nd
un1de
und2si
ung1r
u2ng
unst1a
u2ns
u1r2a.
ure3ni
urenin4
urening3er
ureni2ng
urenin1ge
u1rer
u1res
u2re1sp
ur3de
u2r1i2ns
ur1gr
urs1l2
ur1sk
ur2sv
uro1s
uro1p
u1ry
ur1æ
uræn1
u1ru
ut1ed
u1tri
ut1ru
u1ti3ø
ut1so
u2ts
ut1sp
uto1
u1ty
u1tø
u1i1e
ui2d
ui3den
ui1de
ui2g
u1is
ui2m
uge1j
u1ge
u2g1in
u1gi
ug2st
u2gs
us1ar3r
us1ak
use3s
u1se
us1ef
u2s1e1v
u2s1ej
us1l2
us1tag
us1op
us1h
u2s1m
us1kat
us1ko
u2s1kv
us1c
us1pe
us1pl
us1pr
usfe1ri3
us1f
us1fe
us1v
us1j
u1os
uom1
uove2
um2b1l
um1b
um1sa
um2se
ums1l2
um1st
um1s1i
u1mø
u1ka
uk2l
uk4tet
uk1te
u1kæ
u1ce
u2ck1
u1pe
u1pi
up2s1
u1pu
u2f
uf1l
uf2ta
u2ft
u3fæ
ufø2
uæn1
u1øe
uud1
u1ja
u1xe
2j.
ja2mes
ja1me
j1b
1j2e.
je2a
jed1r
je2l3s
je1lo
1je2n.
j2e1ra
je1ru
je1ti
je2tu
1jes
je1so
jes1p
je1sv
1je1h
je1m1a
jem1st
je1mø
je2k1l
j1eks
1je1c
1jep
1jef
1jev
j1da
jds1l2
jd2s1t
jd2s1i
jds1k
jds1p
j1lad
jl1ag
j1le
jl1tr
j1li
j1ly
2j1n
j1re
j1rå
j1ri
jrs1m
jr2s1k
jrs1p
j1ro
j1rø
jr1ud
j1ta
j1te
j2t1e2l1s
jt1rå
j1try
j1ti
j2t1s
jt1u
1ji
j1g
2js
j1san
js1ak
jse3sk
j1se
j2sej
j1str
j1so
j2ska
js1k2r
j2s1ku
js1pl
js1v
1j2ob
jor2d3re
jor1dr
jor1di2
jo1ri
jo1ve
1jy
j1h
jha1
j1m
j1k
j1p
j1fr
1jæg
jø1be2
jø1e
jø1s
jø1v
j1vi
ju2e
ju1d
ju2l2s
juls1t
1jun
ju1ri
ju1g
ju1s
ju1v
1xa
x1ed
xel2
x1et
x1d
x1l
x1r
xi1
xs1
xo1
x1ol
x1m
x1me1
x1k
x1c
1za
za2b
1ze
ze2a
zem1
z1t
zte1
1zi
zo1r
zo1ol
zo1f2
z1h
z1f
z1fe1
z1zo
wa2r
wa1g
w1b
w1t
wi2
w1y
